test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ayapiy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 
  Noun - aýapiy - ok : # -m animate noun, net, Wolvengrey
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg: aýapiy
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitaýapiy
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitaýapiy
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otaýapiya
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otaýapîyiwa
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitaýapînân
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitaýapînaw
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitaýapîwâw
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otaýapîwâwa
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otaýapîyiwa
     
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl: aýapiyak
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitaýapiyak
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitaýapiyak
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otaýapiya
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otaýapîyiwa
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitaýapînânak
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitaýapînawak
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitaýapîwâwak
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otaýapîwâwa
     aýapiy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otaýapîyiwa
     
     aýapiy+N+AN+Sg+Obv: aýapiya
     aýapiy+N+AN+Loc: aýapîhk
     aýapiy+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitaýapîhk
     aýapiy+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitaýapîhk
     aýapiy+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otaýapîhk
     aýapiy+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otaýapîyihk
     aýapiy+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitaýapînâhk
     aýapiy+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitaýapînâhk
     aýapiy+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitaýapîwâhk
     aýapiy+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otaýapîwâhk
     aýapiy+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otaýapîyihk
     
     aýapiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [aýapîs, aýapîsis]
     aýapiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [aýapîsak, aýapîsisak]
     
     aýapiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nicaýapîs, nicaýapîsis]
     aýapiy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kicaýapîs, kicaýapîsis]
